District of Columbia statutes.
46-306.11

Modification of child-support order of another state.

(a)

If § 46-306.13 does not apply, except as otherwise provided in § 46-306.15, upon petition, a tribunal of the District may modify a child-support order issued in another state which is registered in the District if, after notice and hearing, the tribunal finds that:

(1)

The following requirements are met:

(A)

Neither the child, the obligee who is an individual, nor the obligor resides in the issuing state;

(B)

A petitioner who is a nonresident of the District seeks modification; and

(C)

The respondent is subject to the personal jurisdiction of the tribunal of the District; or

(2)

The District is the state of residence of the child, or a party who is an individual is subject to the personal jurisdiction of the tribunal of the District, and all of the parties who are individuals have filed consents in a record in the issuing tribunal for a tribunal of the District to modify the support order and assume continuing, exclusive jurisdiction.

(b)

Modification of a registered child-support order is subject to the same requirements, procedures, and defenses that apply to the modification of an order issued by a tribunal of the District and the order may be enforced and satisfied in the same manner.

(c)

Except as otherwise provided in § 46-306.15, a tribunal of the District may not modify any aspect of a child-support order that may not be modified under the law of the issuing state, including the duration of the obligation of support. If 2 or more tribunals have issued child-support orders for the same obligor and same child, the order that controls and must be so recognized under § 46-302.07 establishes the aspects of the support order which are nonmodifiable.

(d)

In a proceeding to modify a child-support order, the law of the state that is determined to have issued the initial controlling order governs the duration of the obligation of support. The obligor’s fulfillment of the duty of support established by that order precludes imposition of a further obligation of support by a tribunal of the District.

(e)

On the issuance of an order by a tribunal of the District modifying a child-support order issued in another state, the tribunal of the District becomes the tribunal having continuing, exclusive jurisdiction.

History

Feb. 9, 1996, D.C. Law 11-81, § 611, 42 DCR 6748
July 24, 1998, D.C. Law 12-131, § 2(l), 45 DCR 2924
June 22, 2006, D.C. Law 16-137, § 2(f)(9), 53 DCR 3634

Section References

This section is referenced in § 46-302.01, § 46-306.10, and § 46-306.15.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 30-346.11.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 16-137, rewrote the section.

Temporary Amendment of Section

For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(l) of Uniform Interstate Family Support Temporary Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Law 12-94, April 29, 1998, law notification 45 DCR).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary amendment of section, see § 2(l) of the Uniform Interstate Family Support Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-225, December 23, 1997, 45 DCR 151).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 2(l) of the Uniform Interstate Family Support Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-310, March 20, 1998, 45 DCR 1950).

Effective Dates

Applicability: Section 3 of D.C. Law 16-137 provided: “This act shall apply as of April 1, 2007.”

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 611 of the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act (2001 Act).